Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.014

Agent.

"Agent," for the purposes of entering into the standard contract required under RCW 46.01.140(1), means any county auditor or other individual, government, or business entity other than a subagent that is appointed to carry out vehicle registration and certificate of title functions for the department.

[ 2010 c 161 s 102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.